New York, session 2025-2026, A9297.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Host community benefit. 1. Definitions. For the purposes 2 of this act, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 3 (a) "Data center" means all facilities, or a combination of facili- 4 ties, under common ownership at the same site, that receive service from 5 an electric corporation, gas corporation, or municipality, as defined in 6 the public service law, or have applied or requested to receive such 7 service, and have a peak demand of twenty megawatts or more that is used 8 for: 9 (i) computing infrastructure, not including manufacturing; 10 (ii) data processing services; 11 (iii) web hosting services, not including software publishing; 12 (iv) streaming support services, not including streaming distribution; 13 and 14 (v) other related services and functions as defined in rules and regu- 15 lations promulgated by the commission. 16 (b) "Host community" shall mean any town or city within which a data 17 center defined in paragraph (a) of this subdivision, or any portion 18 thereof, has been proposed for development. 19 (c) "Eligible residential technologies" means: 20 (i) cold-climate heat pumps for space heating and cooling; 21 (ii) heat pump water heaters; 22 (iii) rooftop solar photovoltaic systems; and/or 23 (iv) behind-the-meter battery storage systems. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13988-04-6 A. 9297--A 2 1 (d) "Utility" means an electric distribution utility corporation regu- 2 lated pursuant to section 66 of the public service law. 3 2. Each new data center, or any existing data center undergoing a 4 major expansion that will meet or exceed twenty megawatts of additional 5 load, shall, pursuant to subdivision three of this section, fund a 6 program to: (a) provide a discount or credit on the electric utility 7 bills of the local utility's residential customers in a host community; 8 or (b) install eligible residential technologies for such customers. 9 3. The public service commission shall, within ninety days from the 10 effective date of this subdivision, commence a proceeding to establish a 11 program under which data center owners would be required to fund a 12 program to provide a discount or credit on the electric utility bills of 13 the utility's customers in a host community, or to install eligible 14 residential technologies for such customers. Such proceeding shall 15 establish a process to notify host communities and allow such community 16 to indicate whether discounts or credits on utility bills or the instal- 17 lation of any eligible residential technologies is their preferred use 18 of program funding. Such proceeding shall further determine the amount 19 of such discount, credit, or amount of eligible residential technologies 20 to be installed based on all factors deemed appropriate by the commis- 21 sion, including the expected average electrical demand of the facility, 22 the average number of customers within the data center host community, 23 and the expected aggregate annual electric consumption within such host 24 community, and shall include prioritization of low- and moderate-income 25 households and disadvantaged communities, as defined in subdivision five 26 of section 75-0101 of the environmental conservation law, and the role 27 of utilities, if any, in implementing any aspect of such program. 28 § 2. The Long Island Power Authority shall establish a program for 29 data centers within its service territory to achieve the same objectives 30 as set forth and described in section one of this act. 31 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 32 it shall have become a law; provided however, subdivision three of 33 section one of this act shall take effect immediately. Effective imme- 34 diately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 35 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 36 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.